Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB870.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5 of the act of October 4, 1978 (P.L.864, No.167), known as the Storm Water Management Act, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 5. Watershed storm water plans and contents.* * *(d) Each watershed storm water plan may delineate areas abutting or within the watershed where the municipal roadmaster may choose to redirect or amend road projects for the purpose of lessening storm water impacts within the watershed.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617181920